Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.585

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Moneys not subject to collective bargaining.

Any private or public money, including all investment income, deposited in the Washington distinguished professorship trust fund or any local endowment for professorship programs shall not be subject to collective bargaining.

[ 1987 c 8 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.10.872.]